Utah statutes.
53-3-803.   Application for identification card -- Age requirements -- Application on behalf of others.

(1)  A person at least 16 years of age or older may apply to the division for an identification card.

(2)  A person younger than 16 years of age may apply to the division for an identification card with the consent of the applicant's parent or guardian.

(3) (a)  If a person is unable to apply for the card due to his youth or incapacitation, the application may be made on behalf of that person by his parent or guardian.

(b)  A parent or guardian applying for an identification card on behalf of a child or incapacitated person shall provide:

(i)  identification, as required by the commissioner; and

(ii)  the consent of the incapacitated person, as required by the commissioner.

(4)  Beginning on or after July 1, 2012, a person who holds an unexpired Utah license certificate issued under Part 2, Driver Licensing Act, may not be issued a Utah Identification card unless:

(a)  the Utah license certificate is canceled; and

(b)  if the Utah license certificate is in the person's possession, the Utah license certificate is surrendered to the division.

